Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXII Levees, Drainage, and Reclamation of Lands
CHAPTER 267 Drainage and Reclamation Act of 1912
267.350.
Board or court may change assessment — Relevy.

When the county judge/executive has confirmed an assessment for any improvement and it has been modified by a court of superior jurisdiction, or for some unforeseen cause it cannot be collected, the board may change the original assessment to conform to the judgment of the court and to cover any deficit caused by the order of the county judge/executive, or unforeseen occurrence.

In any other case where, for any cause, it is ascertained that the amount assessed against the property in the district is not sufficient to complete the improvement provided for, and a petition is filed by the board, or any three (3) or more of the original petitioners, or by the board and three (3) or more of the petitioners, stating the amount of the deficit, the causes thereof and the amount necessary to be raised in order to complete the work, and asking an additional assessment and levy, the county judge/executive shall cause the county clerk to give notice of the filing and purpose of the petition, and shall fix a time between ten (10) and twenty (20) days from the giving of the notice when the petition will be acted upon, and exceptions, answers or objections received. The notice shall be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and posted in at least three (3) public places in the district. Such publication shall be sufficient notice of the proceeding to all parties affected. Upon hearing, if the county judge/executive finds that the additional assessment and levy asked for in the petition are necessary and ought to be made in order to complete the work, he shall direct such assessment and relevy to be made by the board.

Any additional assessment and relevy made under this section shall be made in the same ratio on the land benefited as the original assessment, and shall be collected in the same way.

History.

2380-35: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 187; 1978, ch. 384, § 410, effective June 17, 1978.

267.360.
Liability of successor in title — Contribution between several owners.

Any person who acquires title to any land affected by any proceeding under this chapter after the preliminary report of the viewers is filed shall be deemed privy to the person owning or in possession under claim of ownership at the time the preliminary report is filed, and shall be bound to the same extent as the owner at that time would be bound if he had remained the owner. The land assessed shall be liable for the assessment against it, and each assessment or installment shall be paid by the owner in possession at the time it becomes due, but as between vendor and purchaser, and in the absence of any agreement to the contrary, the owner in possession at the time any assessment is certified by the board for collection shall be liable for the tax. Any land in which one person owns the life estate, with the remainder to another, shall be assessed and classified by the viewers as any other land, and the names of both life tenant and remainderman reported, if known, and both brought before the court. The tax shall be assessed against each such tract of land, and may be paid by either the life tenant or the remainderman. When so paid the one not paying shall be liable to the one who has paid for such proportion of the amount paid as his interest in the property bears to the total property assessed, according to the life tables at the time in use in this state. To secure contribution the person paying the assessment shall have, for his own benefit, the same lien that is provided for the original tax, which may be enforced by action in any court of competent jurisdiction. In like manner an owner of an undivided interest in land assessed may pay the whole assessment and be entitled to like contribution and substitution.

History.

2380-42.

267.370.
Lien of assessments — Enforcement.

The assessment roll and each assessment installment shall be a paramount lien against the lands assessed, subject only to the lien for state and county taxes.

Any lien established under this chapter may be enforced by an action in the Circuit Court without regard to the amount of the claim, at any time after December 1 of the year for which the assessment was levied, at which time all unpaid assessments shall become delinquent. The suit shall be brought by the board against the property on which the assessment has not been paid. The suit shall be brought in the county in which the property lies, unless the property sued upon lies in more than one county, in which event the suit may be brought on the whole property in any county in which any part of it lies. In all other respects actions to enforce these liens shall be the same as actions for the enforcement of other liens, but the right to institute such actions shall not prevent sales by the sheriff as in cases of delinquent state and county revenue. The title acquired through any sale of land under this section shall be subject to the lien of all subsequent annual installments of assessments. In all suits for the collection of delinquent assessments the judgment shall include all costs of suit and a reasonable attorney’s fee to be taxed by the court. The proceeds of sales made under this section shall be paid into the treasury of the district, and accounted for by the treasurer the same as the assessments.

History.

2380-31, 2380-34, 2380-45.

267.380.
Validity of proceeding — Irregularities — Remedies — Releases.

The assessment roll made up by the board shall be prima facie evidence in all courts that all steps necessary to be taken under this chapter have been properly taken, and that all proceedings are regular and valid. The collection of any assessment shall not be defeated, where the parties are properly before the court, on account of any irregularity in the proceeding that does not affect the substantial rights of the party complaining. Any party or his privies properly before the court under the Rules of Civil Procedure shall be deemed to be before the court for all purposes, and shall be bound by all orders, judgments and proceedings in the case not excepted to or appealed from, in the manner provided for in this chapter. The remedies provided for in this chapter are exclusive of all other remedies. If on appeal or otherwise, or for any cause, any person or property is released, or any assessment raised or lowered, it shall not affect the rights or liability of any other property or person. The failure to appeal within the time prescribed in this chapter shall be a waiver of any right to attack the proceedings.

History.

2380-45, 2380-49.

267.390.
Maintenance of improvements — Maintenance assessments.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all improvements made under this chapter, as well as all public ditches or drains established or constructed under pre-existing laws, shall be under the control and supervision of the board having jurisdiction of the proceedings for the establishment and construction thereof. The board shall keep all such improvements open, free from obstruction and in good repair. For that purpose the board may employ persons and teams, and lease, rent, hire or purchase machinery.

For the purpose of providing funds to pay the compensation of the employees of the board, outside of that portion to be paid out of the original assessment on any district, and for the purpose of paying the expense of repairing, keeping open and looking after the various improvements under the charge of the board, the land in each district established under this chapter, as well as the land assessed for each public ditch or system of drainage established under pre-existing laws, shall be assessed in proportion to the original assessment made against the land for the original improvement, except that where a district has been established diverting the course of water, the board may, in order to relieve land taxed and from which water has been diverted, use funds of the district in maintaining the original watercourse.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, no assessment in any one (1) year for the purposes prescribed in subsection (2) of this section shall exceed ten percent (10%) of the original assessment against the land, and no more than one (1) assessment shall be made in any one (1) year.

In counties having seventy-five (75) or more separate drainage districts or in counties availing themselves of the provisions of this subsection as provided in KRS

267.495

, when a petition signed by a majority of the landowners in any drainage district is filed with and approved by the drainage commissioner, the latter may levy a maintenance assessment not exceeding thirty percent (30%) of the original assessment against the land. The number of assessments which may be levied shall be limited as follows: Where the assessment is ten percent (10%) but not over fifteen percent (15%) no more than one assessment may be levied during any eighteen (18) month period; where the assessment is sixteen percent (16%) but not over twenty percent (20%) no more than one assessment may be levied during any two (2) year period; where the assessment is twenty-one percent (21%) but not over twenty-five percent (25%) no more than one assessment may be levied during any two-and-one-half (2 1/2) year period; and where the assessment is thirty percent (30%) but not less than twenty-six percent (26%) no more than one assessment may be levied during any three (3) year period.

No assessment shall be made until the board has prepared an assessment roll, in duplicate, stating the name of the owners of the land to be affected, and the amount proposed to be assessed against each tract of land. Both the assessment roll and the duplicate shall be signed by the president and secretary of the board. The original shall be kept on file in the office of the board and the duplicate shall be filed with the collector of the assessment. These additional assessments shall have the same effect as original assessments and be collected in the same manner. They shall be kept separate and deposited with the treasurer, who shall keep the accounts for each district separate. Each warrant drawn shall specify out of which account it shall be paid.

The board may compromise and settle, upon such terms and conditions as it deems proper, any maintenance assessment made, levied or assessed prior to February 17, 1936, and may do everything necessary to release and discharge any claim, demand or lien upon land established, made or claimed prior to February 17, 1936, under or by reason of any such maintenance assessment.

History.

2380-7, 2380-39: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 41; 1956, ch. 235, § 4; 1974, ch. 386, § 54.

267.400.
Superintendent of drainage — Duties — Bond — Compensation.

The board may employ a competent person as superintendent of drainage, for such time as it deems necessary. He shall be subject to the orders of the board, and shall look after all improvements under charge of the board and keep them clean, open and in good condition. The superintendent shall furnish bond for the faithful performance of his duties, to be approved by the board and to be in such penal sum as the board prescribes, in favor of the board and for the benefit of any party in interest. If no superintendent is appointed, his work may be done by the chief engineer or some other employee designated by the board. The superintendent, with the approval of the board, may employ any assistance necessary to the performance of his duties. All expenses incurred shall be reported by the superintendent to the board, showing the improvement upon which the work was done or expense incurred. The superintendent shall receive a salary fixed by the board, not to exceed five dollars ($5) per day.

History.

2380-7, 2380-25.

267.410.
Attorney for board — Agreement — Duties.

The board may employ an attorney. Such employment shall be evidenced by a written agreement which, as far as possible, shall specify the exact amount to be paid to the attorney for all services and expenses. The attorney shall conduct all legal actions in which the board is interested, and shall in all legal matters advise the board and its employees, and generally attend to all matters of a legal nature for the board and district. Where no attorney is employed, such legal services shall be performed by the county attorney.

History.

2380-46.

267.420.
Fees — Costs — Expenses — Compensation of employees and viewers.

The fees of officers for services rendered under this chapter shall be the same as fees allowed by law for similar services in other cases. Such fees shall be taxed as part of the costs. The county judge/executive shall also include as costs reasonable fees to the attorneys for the petitioners in the proceeding to establish the improvement. All costs shall be paid on the order of the county judge/executive out of the drainage fund. The compensation allowed for services of the engineers, viewers and for all other labor, unless paid out of funds deposited by the petitioners, shall be paid on the order of the county judge/executive out of the drainage fund. If any part of such expense has been paid by the petitioners, or any deposit for that purpose has been made by them, it shall be refunded to them, without interest, out of the drainage fund. If the improvement is not established, all such costs and expenses shall be paid by the petitioners, and they shall be liable for the same on their bond.

If any person, including any engineer or viewer, who has performed labor in connection with the improvement up to the time of final reference to the board, desires payment of the amount due up to that time, he may so inform the county judge/executive, which shall thereupon notify the petitioners or their attorneys of record of such fact in writing, stating the amount required, and call upon the petitioners to deposit with the county treasurer an amount sufficient to pay the same. The petitioners shall then deposit that amount within thirty (30) days from the date of receiving the notice. If they fail to pay it within that time, the proceeding may be dismissed at the cost of the petitioners. The treasurer shall pay out the money so deposited with him upon order or warrant of the board, if then appointed, and if not, on order of the county judge/executive.

The compensation of the engineer on the board of viewers shall be fixed by the county judge/executive at or before the time of his appointment, by order entered of record. The other viewers shall receive four dollars ($4) per day for the time actually engaged in performing their duties. Rodmen, chain carriers and other laborers employed in the work shall receive not exceeding two dollars ($2) per day for their services. Any fees or compensation not provided for in this chapter shall be fixed by the county judge/executive unless the person providing the services is employed by the board, in which case the board shall fix his fees or compensation. The treasurer shall only pay out money on order of the county judge/executive, or on warrants drawn by the board, signed by its president and countersigned by its secretary.

History.

2380-36: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 411, effective June 17, 1978.

267.430.
Expenses apportioned among districts.

The board shall keep a correct account of the time spent by it, and by each employee, and of each item of expense incurred in connection with any district, and shall charge such time or expense to the district for which it was done. Where the time or expense is applied to more than one district at the same time, it shall be apportioned between them. The compensation of any employee who is paid on a salary basis shall be apportioned by the board in such manner as seems equitable to it, and paid out of the funds to the credit of the several districts under the charge of the board.

History.

2380-38.

267.440.
County treasurer’s duties as treasurer of district — Compensation.

The treasurer of the county in which the district is established shall be treasurer of the district, and the treasurers of the counties other than that in which the proceeding is pending shall pay over to him any funds collected and paid over to them for the benefit of the district, and shall take his receipt therefor in duplicate, the original of which the treasurer paying the money shall keep for his own protection. The duplicate shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county of which the person receiving the money is treasurer. The treasurer of any district shall pay the money in his hands upon warrants signed by the president and attested by the secretary of the board, when presented for payment. In all cases where a county treasurer becomes treasurer of a district, he shall be liable upon his general bond as county treasurer to the extent of any funds of such district entrusted to him, but he shall give a supplementary bond in such additional sum as the board may require. As compensation for his services the treasurer shall receive an amount fixed by the board, but not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any fiscal year.

History.

2380-48.

267.450.
Landowner’s right to use improvement as an outlet.

The owner of any land that has been assessed for the cost of any improvement may use the improvement as an outlet for lateral drains from his land. If the land is separated from the improvement by the land of another, and the owners are unable to agree as to the terms on which the one may enter the land of the other and construct the drain or ditch, he may file his ancillary petition in the pending proceeding, and have the same condemned in the same manner as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. When the ditch is constructed it shall become a part of the drainage system and be under the control of, and kept in repair by, the board.

History.

2380-30: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 101.

267.460.
Natural drain may become public ditch.

Whenever any public ditch or drain established and constructed under this chapter or any pre-existing law empties into a natural drain, creek or nonnavigable watercourse, such natural drain, creek or watercourse from the mouth of the public ditch or drain to the mouth of the natural drain, creek or watercourse shall be a public ditch, and subject in the same manner as other public ditches to the supervision and control of the board. If such natural drain, creek or watercourse below the mouth of the public ditch extends into any other county, the supervision and control of the board of the county in which the public ditch is located shall not extend into the other county beyond the mouth of the public ditch in that county.

History.

2380-40.

267.470.
Obstructions — Landowner liable for damage caused by him.

If any obstruction exists in any natural drain, creek or nonnavigable stream that constitutes an outlet for any public ditch, as provided in KRS

267.460

, and the board considers the removal of such obstruction necessary for the successful operation of the public ditch or drain, the board may have such obstruction removed, paying the cost thereof out of funds collected from any district, ditch or drain for which it is an outlet. If it is an outlet for more than one (1), the expense shall be prorated between them in such manner as the board considers equitable.

If any repairs to any improvement or to any natural drain, creek or nonnavigable stream under the control of the board become necessary because of the act or negligence of the owner of any land through which it passes, or his servants or agents, or if the repairs are made necessary by any stock of the landowner, his servants or agents, the repairs necessary to restore it to its previous condition shall be made by such owner at his own expense. The superintendent of drainage shall notify the owner of any such obstruction. If the owner fails to remove it within thirty (30) days thereafter, the superintendent shall have it removed, paying the cost in the same manner as provided in subsection (1) of this section. Any amount so paid, with interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum, shall be charged to the landowner in fault, and may be recovered by the board in any court of competent jurisdiction, and shall constitute a lien upon the land that may be enforced as other liens. Any amount so recovered shall be returned to the fund from which it was paid.

History.

2380-41, 2380-43.

267.480.
Damage or obstruction of improvement.

No person shall damage or obstruct any improvement or waterway under the control of the board. No person shall place any floodgate, bridge or fence across the same, unless the right so to do is first obtained from the board by order entered upon its record specifying the kind of floodgate, bridge or fence, and the same shall be erected only in accordance with that order. The superintendent of drainage shall see that this section and KRS

267.470

are enforced.

History.

2380-43.

267.490.
Drainage commissioner and board of supervisors in counties having seventy-five or more districts or operating under KRS 267.495.

In all counties having seventy-five (75) or more drainage districts or in all counties availing themselves of the provisions of this section as provided in KRS

267.495

, a drainage commissioner shall be appointed as provided in subsection (5) of this section who shall have and exercise all of the powers and duties vested in directors and boards of drainage commissioners elected under the provisions of KRS

267.090

and

267.100

. The person so appointed shall hold office for a term of one (1) year and until his successor shall be appointed and qualify. He shall execute bond for the faithful performance of his duties in the penal sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall be sworn to faithfully perform the duties of his position to the best of his ability. Any vacancy in said office shall be filled by the board of supervisors.

The commissioner may acquire, hold, encumber, sell and convey any property necessary to the conduct of his affairs as commissioner, may sue and be sued, contract and be contracted with, and shall possess any other powers and rights necessary for carrying on his work under the provisions of this chapter. No sale or conveyance of real property shall be made by the commissioner without the written consent of the board of supervisors duly entered in the minutes of the board.

The commissioner shall be paid as full compensation for his services an amount fixed by the board of supervisors at the time of his appointment as reasonable, provided the amount is within available funds and not inconsistent with legal limitations on salaries. In addition, the commissioner shall be reimbursed for all traveling expenses incurred in the performance of his duties which, with the salary, shall be paid out of the drainage funds.

With the approval of the board of supervisors, the commissioner may appoint a secretary-treasurer and fix his compensation. The secretary-treasurer shall collect and receive all moneys due to the drainage commissioner by reason of assessments and otherwise, and shall disburse the same as directed by the drainage commissioner. The secretary-treasurer shall execute bond to the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the use and benefit of the drainage districts in the county, in a penal sum to be fixed by the county judge/executive, and shall make an annual report to the board of supervisors of all collections and disbursements. The commissioner shall submit an audit of the drainage funds biennially to the board of supervisors.

A board of five (5) supervisors shall be established as provided in this subsection. The county judge/executive shall call a general meeting during the month of May wherein owners of lands included in established drainage districts shall be eligible voters. In a general way, the judge shall indicate, at such meeting, five (5) divisions of the total drainage district areas that will be somewhat equal in terms of area of land. Landholders in each division so defined by the county judge/executive shall elect by vote one (1) of their number. The judge may hold elections for all such divisions on a given day or designate two (2) or more days for such elections. The term of office will be four (4) years, except that after the first election the five (5) supervisors shall cast lots by which two (2) shall be selected for two (2) year terms and three (3) for four (4) year terms. Thereafter similar elections shall be held biennially and for four (4) year terms. The supervisors within two (2) weeks following their election shall elect from their number a chairman and vice chairman. A secretary-treasurer shall be elected who may or may not be of their number. At this meeting the supervisors shall fix the number, time and place of regular meetings. Special meetings of supervisors may be on call of the chairman. The board of supervisors shall have the authority to fix salaries as provided above, to determine qualification standards for a drainage commissioner, secure and appoint such commissioner, to counsel and advise with the commissioner for the purpose of effecting the greatest good to the greatest number of land owners within the district, and shall receive and record reports of progress from the commissioner. Any vacancies in the board of supervisors due to death, resignation, or incapacity to serve shall be filled by appointment made by the county judge/executive.

The board of supervisors shall have the power and authority to equalize assessments of all lands of like classification for, and only for, the purpose of providing funds to purchase machinery and equipment necessary in carrying out the work of the commissioner.

History.

2380c-1, 2380c-2: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1950, ch. 160, § 1; 1956, ch. 235, § 5.

267.495.
Board may elect for county to be subject to provisions of KRS 267.390(3)(b) and 267.490.

The board of drainage commissioners of any county, regardless of the number of drainage districts contained therein, may by resolution of the said board certified to the county judge/executive, elect for such county to be subject to the provisions of KRS 267.390(3)(b) and

267.490

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 235, § 1, effective May 18, 1956.

267.500.
Establishment of separate districts. [Repealed.]

267.510.
Board for separate district — Election — Term — Vacancies.

As soon as practicable after the judgment establishing a separate drainage district becomes final, the county judge/executive shall, with the advice and assistance of the engineer, enter an order dividing the district into three (3) precincts, as near equal in area of lands reported as benefited as is practicable, and calling a meeting of the landowners affected, to be had at some public place in the county in which the proceeding is pending, at a day and hour fixed in the order. The date for the meeting shall be not less than twenty (20) days from the entry of the order calling it. The county clerk shall give notice of the meeting by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and by posting not less than five (5) posters in different public places in the district at least fifteen (15) days before the date set. The landowners, when assembled, shall organize by the election of a chairman and secretary of the meeting, who shall conduct the election. At this election each acre of land, as near as may be arrived at by estimate or from the evidence heard before the county judge/executive on the cross-petition, shall represent one (1) share, and each owner shall be entitled to one (1) vote for each share estimated to be owned by him in the district. The name of at least one (1) person shall be put in nomination for the office of district commissioner from each of the three (3) precincts. The one (1) person from each of the three (3) precincts receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected as district commissioner. The district commissioner shall immediately by lot determine the terms of their office, which shall be, respectively, one (1), two (2) and three (3) years, and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified.

Each year after the election of the first district board, at such time and place in the district as the district board designates, and after notice, as above provided, the landowners in the district shall meet and elect one (1) district commissioner, who shall be an owner of land in the same precinct as that in which the district commissioner whose term is about to expire owns land, and who shall hold office for three (3) years and until his successor is elected and qualified. In case of a vacancy in any office of district commissioner, the remaining district commissioners may fill the vacancy, with some person having the precinct qualification, until the next annual election, when a successor shall be elected for the unexpired term. A district commissioner whose term is expiring shall be eligible for reelection.

History.

2380-20: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 188; 1978, ch. 384, § 412, effective June 17, 1978.

267.520.
Powers and duties of district board.

The persons elected on the district board shall qualify and organize in the same manner as the county board, and shall thereupon be a body corporate with like powers, duties and responsibilities, within their respective districts, as is conferred upon the county board, and with full jurisdiction and control over the work provided for and established under the proceeding in which their election was provided for, or connected therewith. The district board shall continue in existence only so long as necessary to complete the work in the proceeding in which it was elected, and to pay off all bonds that have been issued. When the work is completed and paid for, and the bonds issued by the district have been fully paid off and satisfied, the improvement of the district, established and constructed by the district board, shall be turned over to the county board, and the district board shall then cease to exist, the district to continue by the same name or number under the jurisdiction and control of the county board. Until all bonds issued by the district board are paid off and the work turned over to the county board, the district board shall have the same authority as the county board to levy maintenance assessments to keep the improvements in repair, and to do anything in connection with the district that the county board could do.

History.

2380-21.

267.530.
Amendment of order establishing district.

The order of the court by which any district is organized under this chapter may be amended at any time by adding, omitting or correcting the name of any landowner, and by adding, omitting or correcting the description of any land within or alleged to be within the district, or by amending the decree of incorporation in any manner necessary to better fulfill the object of the district. When any such amendment is desired, the board shall present a supplemental petition to the court, setting forth the amendment desired, with the name of the owner and a description of the land affected by the proposed amendment. If the owner of the land is not a party to the original proceeding, he shall be brought before the court in the same manner and with the same rights as an original party to the proceeding.

History.

2380-22.

267.540.
Enlargement of district.

Any drainage district organized under the provisions of this chapter may be enlarged and the boundaries extended so as to include other contiguous land, in the manner set forth in this section. The board may present a petition to the county judge/executive who organized the district, asking that the boundaries of the district be extended and such outlying land be included in the district, particularly describing the land and giving the name of the owner. When such petition is filed, the owner of any land to be included in the district shall be brought before the county judge/executive in the same manner as an original party to the proceeding, with the same right to protest against the proposed action or file exceptions thereto. If no objection is made to the petition, the county judge/executive shall order the land included and the boundaries enlarged or extended as prayed. If any objection is made, the county judge/executive shall hear the objection and shall order all or any part of the land included as appears just, and the boundaries shall be ordered changed accordingly. The land so included shall be subject to all dues, assessments and liabilities and entitled to all the benefits and privileges of the district the same as the land originally incorporated. The owner of any land contiguous to any such district may by petition to the county judge/executive and with the consent of the board have his land annexed to the district on such terms as the county judge/executive may deem just, and thereafter his land shall be part of the district the same as the other land in the district.

History.

2380-23: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 413, effective June 17, 1978.

267.550.
Fiscal court to control improvements made by general taxation — Use.

Nothing in this chapter shall deprive any fiscal court of its jurisdiction and control over any levee, ditch or drain established or constructed by authority of the fiscal court, payment for which was or is made by general taxation or out of the public revenue of the county. Any such drain may be utilized as an outlet for any improvement established under this chapter. The fiscal court may delegate to the board of drainage commissioners control over any levee, ditch or drain so established by it, upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between them. The agreement shall be written, approved by the fiscal court and the board of drainage commissioners, and recorded upon the minutes of the proceedings of both bodies.

History.

2380-24.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A board of drainage commissioners could agree to pay costs above $100,000 for clearing of the channel of the Salt River and the fiscal court could make appropriations to assist in construction and maintenance of this improvement subject to the debt limitations of the constitution.

OAG 63-869

.

267.560.
Appropriations to aid district.

The fiscal court of any county may, when in its judgment the public interests and welfare justify it, make appropriations to aid any drainage district of the county in making or maintaining any improvement.

History.

2380-24.

267.570.
Discontinuance of improvements.

At any time a majority in number and amount of those assessed for the maintenance of any improvement may petition the county judge/executive for a discontinuance of the improvement. The petition shall give the names of all persons interested in the maintenance of the improvement and owning land in the district. The county judge/executive shall set a hearing date not less than fifteen (15) days after the filing of the petition, and shall issue notices and cause them to be served upon all parties interested, notifying them of the date that the county judge/executive will consider the petition. If no valid reason is shown against the discontinuance of the improvement, the county judge/executive shall enter an order discontinuing it, after which it shall cease to be a public improvement. An appeal may be had from the order to the Circuit Court, as provided in the establishment of improvements.

History.

2380-49a: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 414, effective June 17, 1978.

267.990.
Penalties.

Any railroad company that fails to remove obstructions and allow construction on its right-of-way as required by KRS

267.270

shall be subject to a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) per day for each day of delay, to be collected by the board for the benefit of the district in any court having jurisdiction.

Any landowner who fails to remove any obstruction or make any repairs as required by subsection (2) of KRS

267.470

, within thirty (30) days after being notified by the superintendent of drainage, shall be fined not less than ten ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

267.480

shall be fined not less than ten ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

2380-13, 2380-43.